Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MIND THE G.A.P.P.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Mind the G.A.P.P. (Gaining Assistance to Prosperity Program) to improve the quality of life of unemployed and underemployed individuals by improving their employment outcomes and developing individual earnings potential. This is a onetime appropriation. Any unencumbered balance remaining at the end of the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end